Nebraska, session 109, LB13A.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB13A LB13A
2025 2025
Section 1. There is hereby appropriated (1) $-0- from the General
Fund for FY2025-26 and (2) $1 from the General Fund for FY2026-27 to the
Department of Health and Human Services, for Program 347, to aid in
carrying out the provisions of Legislative Bill 13, One Hundred Ninth
Legislature, First Session, 2025.
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2025-26
$-0- General Funds for state aid, which shall only be used for such
purpose. There is included in the appropriation to this program for
FY2026-27 $1 General Funds for state aid, which shall only be used for
such purpose.
No expenditures for permanent and temporary salaries and per diems
for state employees shall be made from funds appropriated in this
section.
-2-